District of Columbia statutes.
34-1124

Rules and regulations affecting rates to be filed.

Every public utility shall file with and as a part of such schedule all rules and regulations that in any manner affect the rates charged or to be charged for any service.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 981, ch. 150, § 8, par. 25
Rate change procedures, appeal and review, see § 34-901.
1981 Ed., § 43-524.
1973 Ed., § 43-324.